Nebraska, session 109, LB595.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB595 LB595
2025 2025
Section 1. The Research Excellence Cash Fund is created. The fund
shall be administered by the University of Nebraska. The fund shall
consist of money from gifts, grants, or bequests designated for the fund
and transfers authorized by the Legislature. The fund may be used to
support research-based investments in data, data collection, and ongoing
research critical to the Nebraska economy, including, but not limited to,
the Nebraska Mesonet system. Any money in the fund available for
investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to
the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds
Investment Act.
Sec. 2. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-2-